District of Columbia statutes.
6-1451.08

Green building fee.

(a)

A green building fee is established to fund the implementation of this chapter and the Green Building Fund.

(b)

Upon March 8, 2007, the green building fee shall be established by increasing the building permit fees in effect at the time in accordance with the following schedule of additional fees:

(1)

New construction — an additional $0.0020 per square foot.

(2)

Alterations and repairs exceeding $1,000 but not exceeding $1 million — an additional 0.13% of construction value; and

(3)

Alterations and repairs exceeding $1 million — an additional 0.065% of construction value.

Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-234, § 9, 54 DCR 377
June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-139, § 2(g), 59 DCR 2555
This section is referenced in § 6-1451.07.
D.C. Law 19-139, in subsec. (b), substituted “building permit” for “building construction permit”.